parSem/xip/archive/simple.3/esperanto/GRAMMARS/ENGLISH/FST/src/lex-docs.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 Names of Documents, Books, ...
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 12-Apr-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 
!# [0]: old analyser (cf. old-roots.txt)
!#
!# [w]:  http://en.wikipedia.org
!# [w1]: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Books_of_the_Bible
!# 
!# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop		! proper name

+PostMod	! post-modifier [not used]
+PreMod		! pre-modifier	[not used]
+Head		! head word  	(e.g. "Document")

+Doc		! document
+Relig		! religuous (e.g. book of the bible)

+Abbr		! abbreviation
+Acron		! acronym


! for internal use:
^MAN		! for irregular plura -man -> -men
^AND		! " and " or "&"
^DOT		! optional period at end of abbreviation
^PlE		! plural ending with -e-


! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! tag combinations:
!	+Prop +Doc +Head 	[+Sg|Pl] (%+Gen)
| 	+Prop +Doc +Relig 
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON ROOT

Book+Doc					HEAD;
Document+Doc					HEAD;

! books of the bible
1% Chronicles+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
1% Corinthians+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
1% Esdras+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
1% John+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
1% Kings+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
1% Maccabees+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
1% Peter+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
1% Samuel+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
1% Thessalonians+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
1% Timothy+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
2% Chronicles+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
2% Corinthians+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
2% Esdras+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
2% John+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
2% Kings+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
2% Maccabees+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
2% Peter+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
2% Samuel+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
2% Thessalonians+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
2% Timothy+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
3% John+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
3% Maccabees+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
4% Maccabees+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Acts+Doc+Relig					PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Amos+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Apocalypse+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Baruch+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Ben% Sira+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w]
Chronicles+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Colossians+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Corinthians+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Daniel+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Deuteronomy+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Ecclesiastes+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Ecclesiasticus+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w]
Ephesians+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Esdras+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Esther+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Exodus+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Ezekiel+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Ezra+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Galatians+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Genesis+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Habakkuk+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Haggai+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Hebrews+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Hosea+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
I% Corinthians+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
I% Esdras+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
I% John+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
I% Kings+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
I% Maccabees+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
I% Peter+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
I% Samuel+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
I% Thessalonians+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
I% Timothy+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
II% Chronicles+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
II% Corinthians+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
II% Esdras+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
II% John+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
II% Kings+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
II% Maccabees+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
II% Peter+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
II% Samuel+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
II% Thessalonians+Doc+Relig			PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
II% Timothy+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
III% John+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
III% Maccabees+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Isaiah+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
IV% Maccabees+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
James+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Jeremiah+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Job+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Joel+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
John+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Jonah+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Joshua+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Jude+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Judges+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Judith+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Kings+Doc+Relig					PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Lamentations+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Letter% of% Jeremiah+Doc+Relig			PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Leviticus+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Luke+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Maccabees+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Malachi+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Mark+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Matthew+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Micah+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Nahum+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Nehemiah+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
New% Testament+Doc+Relig			PROP/SG;	
Numbers+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Obadiah+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Odes% of% Solomon+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Old% Testament+Doc+Relig			PROP/SG;	
Peter+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Philemon+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Philippians+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Proverbs+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Psalms% of% Solomon+Doc+Relig			PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Psalms+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Psalter+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[0]
Revelation% of% Christ% to% John+Doc+Relig	PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Romans+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Ruth+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Samuel+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Sirach+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Song% of% Solomon+Doc+Relig			PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Song% of% Songs+Doc+Relig			PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Thessalonians+Doc+Relig				PROP/PL;	!#	[w1]
Timothy+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Titus+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Tobit+Doc+Relig					PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Wisdom% of% Salomon+Doc+Relig			PROP/SG;	!#	[0]
Wisdom+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Zechariah+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]
Zephaniah+Doc+Relig				PROP/SG;	!#	[w1]

!# ============================================================================
!# CONTINUATION CLASSES
!# ============================================================================

LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;


LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!#  name modifiers
LEXICON PREMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PreMod:0 >		#;
!LEXICON POSTMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PostMod:0 >	#;

LEXICON HEAD/SG		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON HEAD/PL		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON HEAD		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# demonyms

LEXICON NOUN		< %+Noun:0 >			N/SG+PLs;
LEXICON NOUNINV		< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		optGENSG;

LEXICON ADJ		< %+Adj:0 >			#;

! noun or adjective
LEXICON NADJ		< %+NAdj:0 %+Sg:0 >		#;
			< %+Noun:0 %+Sg:0 >		GENSG;
			< %+Noun:0 %+Pl:{+s} >		optGENPL;
LEXICON NADJINV		< %+NAdj:0 %+SP:0 >		#;
			< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		GENSG;

! possible replacement:
! LEXICON NADJ		ADJ; NOUN;
! LEXICON NADJINV	ADJ; NOUNINV;
